tools/tts/test/yamls/generation.yaml
---
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-tts-gt-norm.hfstol

Tests:
  Normaliser generation tests:  # words that normaliser needs to generate
    jahkásaš+A+Ess: jahkásažžan
    guhttanuppelotčuođi+Num+Sg+Nom: guhttanuppelotčuođi
    duhátguhttačuođi+Num+Sg+Nom: duhátguhttačuođi
